tex/ukrhyph/ukrhypfa.pat.txt
.ави2
.аві2
.ади2
.аді2
.аль5
.ас6к
.аш1
.бе2з1у2
.бє2з1у2
.випукл1
.випу2к
.во2ск
.дво2є
.ди2а
.до1см
.ді2а
.зас2
.зау2
.заш2
.зо2о3
.иг2
.из1н
.ис1ти
.ис5тр
.кри1п
.крі1п
.ле1м
.ль2
.ма3
.ме2ж5
.ми2нат
.мо2г1л
.мі2нат
.над5
.на1ч2н
.на5в6
.неа6
.не1в
.не1з2
.не5л
.не6ври
.не6врі
.нос5к
ас5на.
.об3
.об1ле
.об1ло
.об1лє
.об1ре
.об1ру
.об5лив
.об5лит
.об5лів
.об5літ
.ог1н
.оз2
.ос2п
.ото1м
.от1р
.от3в
.пе5ре5
.під5
.по3
.по1в2
.по1ж2
.пре1л
.прос2
.прє1л
.ра2с1та
.реги6о
.регі6о
.сеп5т
.соп1л
.тек1с
.топ1л
.тран2с1
.ть2
.тєк1с
.уд2л
.ук2
.ур6в
.хла2
.ча2е
.ча2є
.черст5
.чер2с
.че2ст1в
.чєрст5
.чєр2с
.чє2ст1в
.іг2
.із1н
.іс1ті
.іс5тр
.їг2
.їз1д
.їс1ті
.їс5тр
1агро
1адм
1алг
1ампе
1ампє
1апп
1атак
1бе
1бл
1бри
1брі
1бу
1бю
1бя
1бє
1ваг
1вег
1велл
1вер.
1вз2
1вих
1вич
1ви
1вл
1вок
1воя
1вп
1вр2
1вуд
1вю
1вєг
1вєлл
1вєр.
1віх
1віч
1в2са
1в2сп
1в2сх
1в2сю
1в2шив
1в2шів
1га
1глам
1гор
1гр
1движ
1двиз
1двіз
1дзе.
1дневн
1дняш
1дов
1доч
1дроб
1дром
1дун
1дьє
1д2лев
1д2лил
1д2лєв
1д2ліл
1д6раж
1е2к
1жг
1жд
1жму
1зву
1зол
1зу
1кав
1кае
1кап
1кат
1каю
1кає
1кив
1кл
1комп
1кон
1коо
1кос
1кош
1кр
1ків
1ланд
1леде
1льо
1лью
1маг
1мей
1мен.
5ми.
1мкн
1мон
1мш
1мще
1мщє
1мєй
1мєн.
1над
3на.
1на1г
1на1с2
1на1ш2
1ниц
1ной
1ном
1нох
1но.
1нра
1ную
1ньо
1нью
1ня
1ніц
1обес
1об'
1обєс
1окт
1отд
1отп
1о2боз
1пенз
1печ
1пис
1плав
1плаз
1плик
1пли
1плік
1по
1пр
1птог
1пєнз
1пєч
1піс
1п2лет
1п2лєт
1п2си
1п2сі
1п6том
1раб
1ралг
1реги
1регі
1реза
1рекла
1риб
1росш
1рєги
1рєгі
1рєза
1рєкла
1са
1св
1се
1сж
1си
1скаф
1скоп
1сл
1со3
1спенс
1спєнс
1ср
1сто
1стров
1су
1сфе
1сфє
1схе
1схє
1счас
1счит
1счіт
1с'
1сє
1сі
1с2пот
1с2цем
1с2цєм
1такт
1тека
1текш
1терл
1тече
1ткн
1тле
1тлє
1толк
1торс
1торц
1точн
1треб
1триб
1труб
1трєб
1тріб
1тєка
1тєкш
1тєрл
1тєчє
1т2вор
1т2кан
1т6лит
1т6літ
1узл
1фа
1фи
1фл
1фо
1фр6
1фтонг
1фі
1хв
1хи
1хр
1ху.
1хі
1цам
1цв
1це
1ци
1цо
1цє
1ці
1чел
1чив
1чик
1чле
1члє
1чо
1чт
1чх
1чя
1чєл
1чів
1чік
1шпе
1шпил
1шпє
1шпіл
1ште
1шту
1штє
1шю
1ш2в
1ш2кол
1щи
1щі
1я1ви
1я1ві
2а1ма
2а3о
2бес3п
2блас
2блд
2бль
2брь
2бр.
2бєс3п
2б1д
2б1н
2б1т
2б1ц
2б5к
2вль
2вр.
2в1лаб
2в1лес
2в1лєс
2в1ми
2в1мі
2в1мї
2гроп
2г1б
2г1к
2г1м
2г1п
2г1с
2г1х
2г1ш
2г5т
2далг
2дни
2докт
2дрс
2др.
2д1инф
2д1к
2д1м
2д1обл
2д1о2си
2д1о2сі
2д1с
2д1ф
2д1ш2
2д1інф
2евр
2ен
2е1ко
2е1о
2жаве
2жавє
2ждл
2ждь
2ж1к
2ж1о2с
2ж1ц
2здн
2зна.
2зни
2з1б
2з1инт
2з1инф
2з1к
2з1с
2з1у2с
2з1інт
2з1інф
2имене
2имень
2имєнь
2имєнє
2и1б
2и1ви
2казк
2каф
2кль
2кл.
2кн
2кс
2к1б
2к1г
2к1к
2к1лак
2к1м
2к1т
2к1ц
2к1ш
2к1я
2л1н
2мотп
2м1в2
2м1изд
2м1л
2м1ізд
2невн
2нотд
2няш
2нєвн
2н1изд
2н1с
2н1ц
2н1ш
2н1ізд
2ов
2од
2ол
2ом
2опир
2опір
2остал
2осф
2оф
2о1а2
2о1г
2о1е
2о1за
2о1и
2о1ри
2о1со
2о1те
2о1тр
2о1тє
2о1у2
2о1хи
2о1хі
2о1і
2о5хро
2прс
2пс.
2п1к
2п1м
2п1н
2п1п
2п1ст
2п1ф
2п1ц
2п1ч
2п1ш
2рае
2рисп
2ротд
2рісп
2р1алю
2р1орт
2скн
2ск.
2сль
2смен.
2смєн.
2сни
2сск
2ств.
2стерл
2стк
2стн
2стр.
2сть.
2стєрл
2ст.
2сфор
2с1исп
2с1и2ор
2с1лиру
2с1ліру
2с1му
2с1ісп
2с1і2ор
2тамп
2тй
2томм
2томщ
2тонг
2трабо
2трб
2трг
2трд
2тре
2тригр
2трк
2трм
2трп
2трр
2трт
2трф
2трц
2трщ
2трігр
2тр.
2тр1ар
2тр5ш
2туч
2ть.
2т1г
2т6е
2т1инв
2т1инф
2т1м
2т1н
2т1п
2т1с
2т1ф
2т1ц
2т1щ
2т1інв
2т1інф
2т1їнф
2ф1в
2ф1н
2ф1обр
2ф1орг
2ф1с
2х1анг
2х1а2д
2х1ве
2х1вє
2х1г
2х1о2к
2х1с
2х1у2г
2х1у2ч
2ц1г
2ц1з
2ц1к
2ц1л
2ц1м
2ц1от
2ц1о2д
2ц1с
2чтм
2ш1ф
2щ1н
2юм
2євр
2єнр
2є1ко
2є1о
2імене
2імень
2імєнь
2імєнє
2і1б
2і1ви
2їмене
2їмень
2їмєнь
2їмєнє
2ї1б
2ї1ви
3зис
3зіс
3зїс
3к6ниж
3к6ніж
3ная
5нен5ня
3ник.
5ни.
5не.
5ні.
5ня.
3нік
3омме
3оммє
3план
3хор
3чий
3чій
5бв
5би2о
5бот
5боц
5бі2о
5бї2о
5вак
5вале
5валє
5вая
5винт
5винч
5вуа
5вінт
5вінч
5глем
5глєм
5двину
5двіну
5деб
5джа
5дот
5до.
5дью
5дєб
5д6лей
5д6лєй
5жев
5жєв
5зо.
5зри
5зрі
5зрї
5зью
5инж
5инсп
5коа
5кови
5кори
5к6то.
5лиг
5лицо
5личи
5ліг
5ліцо
5лічі
5лїг
5лїцо
5лїчї
5л6жеш
5л6жєш
5мед
5мий
5минг
5моти
5моті
5мотї
5мєд
5мій
5мінг
5мїй
5мїнг
5нап
5нац
5ниб
5ніб
5откр
5пв
5плю
5поси
5прое6
5проє6
5пта.
5птика
5птиц
5пти
5птя
5пя
5п2се
5п6су
5рамл
5рисо
5роуе
5рісо
5скоя
5смес
5сми
5смєс
5сти
5стьо
5с2наб
5течь
5тиге
5тигє
5тиз.
5тля
5тощ
5туди
5тушев
5тушєв
5тяну
5тєчь
5тіге
5тігє
5тіз.
5тїге
5тїгє
5тїз.
5хоз
5хом
5хоу
5ца.
5чан
5ши
5шли
5шло
5штр
5щя
6б1б
6б1г
6б1м
6б1с2
6б1щ
6вск
6в5инф
6в5лик
6в5лич
6в5лік
6в5ліч
6в5рац
6в5рити
6в5ріти
6в5інф
6гл.
6грек
6г5лай
6дз.
6дотд
6дь.
6д1б
6д5роз
6е
6a
6і
6о
6у
6жд.
6зная
6з1ж
6з1м
6з1ру
6ип
6кв.
6кеа
6кр.
6к1ф
6льш
6ль.
6л1с2
6м1б
6м1м
6м1п
6м1т
6м1че
6м1чє
6невк
6нр.
6нєвк
6одар
6окл
6окол
6охор
6о5ба
6планд
6прн
6скон
6слям
6сл.
6сст
6студи
6стьд
6стьс
6сь.
6с1з
6с5лок
6с5чу
6твь.
6тинж
6томе
6томс
6трв
6труп
6тінж
6тїнж
6т1б
6т1ред
6т1рєд
6т1т
6фр.
6фь.
6хв.
6х1ч
6х5ви
6ч1к
6ч1м
6ч5лег
6ч5леж
6ч5лєг
6ч5лєж
6шь.
6ш1б
6ш5д
6євид
6євол
6іп
аа6б
абе3с
абє3с
ага5с6
аг1д
адь2
аді2о
адї2о
ад1аге
ад1агє
ад5рез
ад5рєз
аз'1
аз1ве
аз1ви
аз1во
аз1вє
аз1ві
аз1да
аз1р
аи2г
аи2ни
аи6з5
ай2ма
акоп5л
ак1н
ак1с
ам1ч
анс1у
ан2кр
ан2скр
ан2сп
ан2сур
ан2сц
ао2п
ао2с
ао6к
ар2т1ор
асе5п
асс6п
аст1ву
асє5п
ас1к
ас1пу
ас1трог
ас1х
ас1ч
ас3по
ас5лет
ас5лям
ас5лях
ас5лєт
ас5ми
ас5мі
ас5мї
ате2с1
атє2с1
ат5ви
ат5ві
аут1р
ау2чи
ау2чі
ау2чї
ау5ск
ач5та
аш1та
ая2з
аі2г
аі2ні
аі6з5
аї2г
аї6з5
а1а
а1ба
а1бе
а1би
а1бо
а1бр
а1бу
а1бх
а1бью
а1бьє
а1бьі
а1бю
а1бя
а1бє
а1бі
а1бї
а1ва
а1ви
а1во
а1ву
а1вью
а1вьє
а1вьі
а1вю
а1вя
а1га
а1ге
а1ги
а1гл
а1го
а1гью
а1гьє
а1гьі
а1гю
а1гя
а1гє
а1гі
а1гї
а1да
а1де
а1дж
а1ди
а1до
а1дра
а1ду
а1дц
а1дью
а1дьє
а1дьі
а1дю
а1дя
а1дє
а1ді
а1дї
а1е1
а1жа
а1же
а1жж
а1жи
а1жм
а1жо
а1жу
а1жью
а1жьє
а1жьі
а1жю
а1жя
а1жє
а1жі
а1жї
а1за
а1зе
а1зи
а1зо
а1зью
а1зьє
а1зьі
а1зю
а1зя
а1зє
а1зі
а1зї
а1и
а1ка
а1ке
а1ки
а1ко
а1ку
а1кью
а1кьє
а1кьі
а1кю
а1кя
а1кє
а1кі
а1кї
а1ла
а1ле
а1ли
а1ло
а1лу
а1лью
а1льє
а1льі
а1лю
а1ля
а1лє
а1ме
а1ми
а1мно
а1мо
а1му
а1мью
а1мьє
а1мьі
а1мю
а1мя
а1мє
а1мі
а1мї
а1на
а1не
а1ни
а1но
а1нр
а1ну
а1нью
а1ньє
а1ньі
а1ню
а1ня
а1нє
а1ні
а1па
а1пе
а1пи
а1по
а1пу
а1пью
а1пьє
а1пьі
а1пю
а1пя
а1пє
а1пі
а1п
а1ре
а1ри
а1ро
а1ру
а1рью
а1рьє
а1рьі
а1рю
а1ря
а1рє
а1рі
а1рї
а1р6а
а1са
а1се
а1си
а1со
а1ста
а1сте
а1сти
а1сто
а1сту
а1стью
а1стьє
а1стьі
а1стю
а1стя
а1стє
а1сті
а1стї
а1су
а1сью
а1сьє
а1сьі
а1сю
а1ся
а1сє
а1сі
а1сї
а1с2ше
а1с2шє
а1та
а1те
а1ти
а1то
а1тр
а1ту
а1тью
а1тьє
а1тьі
а1тю
а1тя
а1тє
а1ті
а1тї
а1у
а1фа
а1фе
а1фи
а1фо
а1фу
а1фью
а1фьє
а1фьі
а1фю
а1фя
а1фє
а1фі
а1фї
а1ха
а1хе
а1хи
а1хо
а1ху
а1хью
а1хьє
а1хьі
а1хю
а1хя
а1хє
а1хі
а1хї
а1ца
а1це
а1ци
а1цо
а1цу
а1цє
а1ці
а1цї
а1ча
а1че
а1чи
а1чу
а1чью
а1чьє
а1чьі
а1чє
а1чі
а1чї
а1ч2не
а1ч2нє
а1ша
а1ше
а1ши
а1шо
а1шу
а1шью
а1шьє
а1шьі
а1шє
а1ші
а1шї
а1ща
а1ще
а1щи
а1що
а1щу
а1щью
а1щьє
а1щьі
а1щє
а1щі
а1щї
а1ю
а1я
а1є
а1і
а1ї
а2вот
а2ер
а2их
а2н1об
а2н5уз
а2с1тир
а2с1тір
а2с1тїр
а2уе
а2уле
а2улє
а2ум
а2ун
а2ус
а2іх
а2їх
а3гу
а5ве
а5вє
а5ві
а5гв
а5дви
а5дві
а5з6у
а5лі
а5лї
а5стри
а5щ
а6нинс
а6нінс
а6стян
а6с5тяг
а6томн
бас1м
ба1с2к
бег1л
без1д2
без5в
бесс2
бес1ч
бе1др
бе2з1и
бе2з1і
бе2з1ї
бе2ск
бе2ста
бзд6
био5с
би5стр
бле2с1к
блє2с1к
бл1исп
бл1ісп
бл1їсп
борт5
бор6тр
босо2б1
бос2с
бо1д6р
бо1жж
бо1з
бо1рв
бо1с
бо1т2л
бп5л
бра6сл
бст6
бу1г
б'1
бь1яв
бєг1л
бєз1д2
бєз5в
бєсс2
бєс1ч
бє1др
бє2з1и
бє2з1і
бє2з1ї
бє2ск
бє2ста
біо5с
бі5стр
бїо5с
бї5стр
б1ае
б1ва
б1во
б1вя
б1ж
б1з6
б1лав
б1лег
б1лож
б1лом
б1лєг
б1рив
б1ф
б1х
б1ч
б1ш
б5лиза
б5лим
б5ліза
б5лім
б5лїза
б5лїм
б5оке
б5окє
б5орб
б5риг
б5рид
ван5с6
вах1
ва1д
вдо1с
вез1до
вео2с
ве2ст1в
ве5др
взис5
виа5с
вин6др
ви1ск
ви1ш
ви2ам
ви2зн
ви5аф
ви5ол
ви5он
ви5п
ви5сп
ви5ни
вк1н
вли6е
вли6є
влі6е
влі6є
влї6е
влї6є
воз1в
вои2с
вос1к
воі2с
вої2с
во1вк
во1п
во2стр
впо6л
вра2ж5д
вро5т
вто3к2
ву1з
ву2х1
ву5г
вче6т5
вчє6т5
вєз1до
вєо2с
вє2ст1в
вє5др
віа5с
він6др
ві2ам
ві2зн
ві5аф
ві5ол
ві5он
в1б
в1в
в1г
в1д
в1е
в1к
в1лаг
в1ма
в1мо
в1н
в1с2
в1т
в1ф
в1х
в1ц
в1ча
в1чи
в1чі
в1чї
в1ш
в1щ
в2нуш
в5рас
в5рор
в6би
в6бі
в6бї
в6кус
в6мого
в6моч
в6сег
в6сєг
в6ход
га1ст
га2у
га5др
ге2н1ин
ге2н1ін
ге2н1їн
ге2од
ге2оп
ге2ос
ге2оц
ге6об
ги1с
гко1в
гос1к
гос3с
го1з
го1п
го1сш
го2сб
го2с1а
го2с1тр
гє2н1ин
гє2н1ін
гє2н1їн
гє2од
гє2оп
гє2ос
гє2оц
гє6об
гі1с
гї1с
г1г
г1е
г1з
г1ляе
г1лят
г1ляю
г1ляє
г1ни
г1ні
г1ц
г1ч
да2ген
да2гєн
да2пр
две2с1к
дву1ш
двє2с1к
дес2к
де1гл
де1ст
де2з1а2
де2з1и2о
де2з1о2
де2з1і2о
де2з1ї2о
де2о
де5ре5во5
де5х
дж1м
дж1р
дип5т
дис1тр
ди2ад
ди2ам
ди2об
ди2о5с
ди2сто
ди2с1е
ди2с1є
ди5он
ди5х
дмо1с
дно5д
дото1
до1бр
до1д2
до1з
до1п
до1сн
до1с2п
до1ш2
до2ру
до5мно
до5рва
до6бла
дс3кн
ду1п
ду1ст
ду2о
д'1
дєс2к
дє1гл
дє1ст
дє2з1а2
дє2з1и2о
дє2з1о2
дє2з1і2о
дє2з1ї2о
дє2о
дє5х
діп5т
діс1тр
ді2ад
ді2ам
ді2об
ді2о5с
ді2сто
ді2с1е
ді2с1є
ді5он
ді5х
дїп5т
дїс1тр
дї2ад
дї2ам
дї2об
дї2о5с
дї2сто
дї2с1е
дї2с1є
дї5он
дї5х
д1ва
д1ве
д1вид
д1вис
д1вод
д1вє
д1від
д1віс
д1г2
д1д
д2е
д1за
д1зо
д1л
д1н
д1п
д1рас
д1реж
д1рив
д1руб
д1ряд
д1рєж
д1т
д1х
д1ч
д2мс
д5зем
д5зи
д5зєм
д5зі
д5зї
д6рая
еа2де
еа2з
еа6да
ево2с
ев1ч
ев2ним
ев2нят
ев2нім
ев2п
ев6ку
ег1ла.
ег1ли
ег1ло
ег1н
ег6нат
едоу5к
ежа6т
еж1м
еж1р
ез1во
ез1да
ез1др
ез5ви
ез5ві
еи2г
еи2д
еи2м
екс1
екс2п
ек1н
ек1ск
ек1сту
ель5
ем1не
ем1ч
ен1ри
ен1рі
ен1рї
ен5ре
еоб1л
ео1с
ео2б
ео2ж
ео2кон
ео2пр
ео2ру
ео2са
ео2се
ео2ч
ео2щ
ео6св
ео6су
ео6хв
ео6ш
еп1ле
еп1та
еп1то
еп5ли.
еп5лі.
еп5лї.
еп5те
еп5тич
еп5тур
еп5тіч
еп5тїч
ере1дв
ере1зв
ере1п
ере1сс
ере5гн
ерис2
ери1ск
еро1
еро6б
еріс2
ері1ск
ерїс2
ерї1ск
ер1ае
ер1ват
ер1тя
ер2хи
ер2хі
ер2хї
ер5тли
ер5тлі
ер5тлї
ер6кл
ескрип1
ескріп1
ескрїп1
ес1к
ес1п
ес1тар
ес2па
ес5ва
ес5кур
ес5м
ес5ра
етора5
еу3то
ех1м
ех5об
еш1то
еі2г
еі2д
еі2м
еї2г
еї2д
еї2м
е1а
е1ба
е1бе
е1би
е1бо
е1бр
е1бу
е1бью
е1бьі
е1бю
е1бя
е1бі
е1бї
е1ва
е1ве
е1ви
е3во
е1ву
е1вю
е1вя
е1ві
е1га
е1гд
е1ге
е1ги
е1го
е1гу
е1гью
е1гьі
е1гю
е1гя
е1гі
е1гї
е1да
е1де
е1ди
е1до
е1ду
е1дью
е1дьі
е1дю
е1дя
е1ді
е1дї
е1е
е1жа
е1же
е1жж
е1жо
е1жу
е1жью
е1жьі
е1жю
е1жя
е1за
е1зе
е1зи
е1зо
е1зу
е1зью
е1зьі
е1зю
е1зя
е1зі
е1зї
е1и
е1ка
е1кв
е1ке
е1ки
е1ку
е1кью
е1кьі
е1кю
е1кя
е1кі
е1кї
е1ла
е1ле
е1ли
е1ло
е1лу
е1лью
е1льі
е1лю
е1ля
е1лі
е1лї
е1ма
е1ме
е1ми
е1мо
е1му
е1мью
е1мьі
е1мю
е1мя
е1на
е1не
е1ни
е1но
е1ну
е1нью
е1ньі
е1нь
е1ню
е1ня
е1ні
е1па
е1пе
е1пи
е1по
е1пу
е1пью
е1пьі
е1пю
е1пя
е1пі
е1ра
е1ре
е1ри
е1ру
е1рью
е1рьі
е1рю
е1ря
е1рі
е1рї
е1са
е1сб
е1сд
е1се
е1си
е1со
е1ста
е1ств
е1сте
е1сти
е1сто
е1стр
е1сту
е1стью
е1стьі
е1стю
е1стя
е1сті
е1стї
е1су
е1сью
е1сьі
е1сю
е1ся
е1сі
е1сї
е1с2г
е1та
е1тв
е1те
е1ти
е1тл
е1то
е1тр
е1ту
е1тью
е1тьі
е1тю
е1тя
е1ті
е1тї
е1у
е1фа
е1фе
е1фи
е1фо
е1фу
е1фью
е1фьі
е1фю
е1фя
е1фі
е1фї
е1ха
е1хе
е1хи
е1хо
е1ху
е1хью
е1хьі
е1хю
е1хя
е1хі
е1хї
е1ца
е1це
е1ци
е1цо
е1цу
е1ці
е1цї
е1ча
е1че
е1чи
е1чу
е1чью
е1чьі
е1чі
е1чї
е1ша
е1ше
е1ши
е1шл
е1шо
е1шта
е1шу
е1шью
е1шьі
е1ші
е1шї
е1ща
е1ще
е1щи
е1що
е1щу
е1щью
е1щьі
е1щі
е1щї
е1ю
е1я
е1є
е1і
е1ї
е2вро
е2д
е2д1ап
е2д1ию
е2д1ію
е2д1їю
е2ева
е2оди
е2оді
е2одї
е2она
е2оро
е2р1у2п
е2с3пу
е3ола
е3он.
е5г6но
е5жи
е5жі
е5жї
е5кє
е5мі
е5мї
е5оли
е5оля
е5ол.
е5охл
е5ста.
е6в
е6д5у6г
е6ема
е6стиг
е6стіг
е6стїг
е6ф
е6ц
жат1в
же2о
же5д2
жко1
жє2о
жє5д2
ж1б
ж1ж
ж1з
ж1л
ж1ма
ж1н
ж1п
ж1с
ж1т
ж1ч
ж2же
ж2жє
ж5е
зае2
зан5с6
зас2н
зат2
зая6
зає2
за1вч
за1г2
за1др
за1з2
за1кв
за1р2ж
за1с
за1х
за1ш
за2шк
за3тм
за5п6ну
за5тв
за5у
зве2т3в
звє2т3в
зв2
зг1ну
зди2с
здро2
зді2с
здї2с
зи5дв
зи6оно
зок2
зо1б
зо1д2р
зо1з2
зо1рв
зо1с2
зо1щ
зо5м6
з'я5в
зі5дв
зі6ні
зі6оно
зї5дв
зї6оно
з1акт
з1вк
з1вя
з1г
з1дв
з1де
з1ди
з1ду
з1дя
з1дє
з1ді
з1дї
з1е
з1з
з1л
з1не
з1но
з1ну
з1нє
з1ні
з1окс
з1орг
з1п
з1ра
з1род
з1ря
з1т
з1ц
з1ч
з1ш
з2рак
з2рач
з5вет
з5вєт
з5гна
з5да.
з5дом
з5рез
з5рєз
з6вон
з6мс
иас2
иа1ск
иг1н
иди3ом
иди5а
ид1ц
изг1не
изг1нє
изи1с
изо1т
изо2о
из'5
из1в
из1д
из2ва
из2гн
из5ре
из5рє
ии2з
икс1ту
ик1в
ик1н
ик1ск
иле1п
илє1п
им1н
им1ч
ино5с
инс2
ин1атом
ин1р
иос2
ио2ста
ио5сп
ип1ле
ип1лє
ип1ту
ире2х
ирє2х
ир5в
иск1н
ист1в
ис1б
ис1к
ис1м
ис1п
ис1тек
ис1тєк
ис1ч
ис2пас
ис5ки
ис5кі
ис5кї
ис5тец
ис5тєц
ис6па
ис6пл
ит1ва
ит1ве
ит1вє
ит1в
ит1уч
ит5ву
иу2г
иу2ч
иу6р
иш1ле
иш1лє
ия2д
и1а
и1ба
и1бе
и1би
и1бо
и1бр
и1бу
и1бью
и1бьє
и1бьі
и1бю
и1бя
и1бє
и1бі
и1бї
и1ва
и1ве
и1во
и1ву
и1вью
и1вьє
и1вьі
и1вю
и1вя
и1вє
и1ві
и1в2с
и1га
и1ге
и1ги
и1гл
и1го
и1гу
и1гью
и1гьє
и1гьі
и1гю
и1гя
и1гє
и1гі
